test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-vwlkw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

# This gold standard is automatically generated from the Votic dictionary
# at Språkbanken (https://spraakbanken.gu.se/karp/#?mode=votiska)

Tests:
  Noun - võlkõ :   # should decline like the paradigm 'p2_aikõ..nn.1'
    võlkõ+N+Sg+Nom: võlkõ
    võlkõ+N+Pl+Nom: võlgõd
    võlkõ+N+Sg+Gen: võlga
    võlkõ+N+Pl+Gen: [võlkoi, võlkojõ]
    võlkõ+N+Sg+Par: [võlka, võlkaa]
    võlkõ+N+Pl+Par: [võlkoi, võlkoitõ]
    võlkõ+N+Sg+Ill: [võlka, võlkasõ]
    võlkõ+N+Pl+Ill: võlkoisõ
    võlkõ+N+Sg+Ine: võlgõz
    võlkõ+N+Pl+Ine: võlkoiz
    võlkõ+N+Sg+Ela: võlgõssõ
    võlkõ+N+Pl+Ela: võlkoissõ
    võlkõ+N+Sg+All: võlgõllõ
    võlkõ+N+Pl+All: võlkoillõ
    võlkõ+N+Sg+Ade: võlgõl
    võlkõ+N+Pl+Ade: võlkoil
    võlkõ+N+Sg+Abl: võlgõltõ
    võlkõ+N+Pl+Abl: võlkoiltõ
    võlkõ+N+Sg+Tra: võlgõssi
    võlkõ+N+Pl+Tra: võlkoissi
    võlkõ+N+Sg+Ter: võlkassaa
    võlkõ+N+Pl+Ter: võlkoissaa
    võlkõ+N+Sg+Com: võlgaka
    võlkõ+N+Pl+Com: võlkoika
